Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2213.04
Personal inspection, defined.

Personal inspection means a real property appraiser's in-person observation of identified real estate or real property without the use of special testing or special equipment performed as part of an evaluation assignment, valuation assignment, or appraisal review assignment.

Laws 2024, LB992, § 4.